Utah statutes.
76-10-2601.   Fencing of shafts and wells.

(1)  Any person who has sunk or sinks a shaft or well on the public domain for any purpose shall enclose it with a substantial curb or fence, which shall be at least 4-1/2 feet high.

(2)  Any person violating this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

